Arkansas, session 2025, SB647.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 14 is amended to add an additional
chapter to read as follows:
CHAPTER 177
ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT DISTRICT ACT OF 2025

Subchapter 1 — General Provisions

14-177-101. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Economic
Development District Act of 2025”.

14-177-102. Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) “Alcoholic beverage sales tax” means the taxes levied under
§§ 3-7-201 and 3-9-213;
(2) “Available funds” means revenues, grant funds, and other
moneys received by an economic development district minus:
(A) The property charge baseline;
*JLL259*
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(B) The sales charge baseline;
(C) Any reserved property charge; and
(D) Any reserved sales charge;
(3) “Cooperative area” means an area designed by one (1) or more
municipalities, one (1) or more counties, or a combination of one (1) or more
municipalities and one (1) or more counties operating under a written
agreement in which the participating municipalities or participating
counties, or both, agree to establish an economic development district by
mutually adopting a formation charter;
(4) “Economic development” means one (1) or more of the
following:
(A) Job creation;
(B) Job retention;
(C) Job attraction;
(D) Economic growth; and
(E) Economic diversification;
(5)(A) “Economic development construction” means the process of
constructing, improving, modifying, or removing improvements within an
economic development district for purposes that directly contribute to the
economic development goals of the economic development district in accordance
with the economic development plan.
(B) “Economic development construction” includes without
limitation manufacturing, technology, research and development, business
incubators, retail, entertainment, housing, healthcare, restaurants,
hospitality, childcare, energy production, infrastructure projects, and any
other type of venture or facility that the board of an economic development
district determines is beneficial to an economic development district under §
14-177-304;
(6) “Economic development district” means a designated area
within a municipality, county, or cooperative area that is established under
this chapter to promote, facilitate, or secure economic development and
revitalization within the designated area;
(7) “Economic development plan” means a document detailing the
goals, strategies, and initiatives to be undertaken to stimulate economic
development within an economic development district;
(8) “Establishing authority” means:
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(A) For a municipality or county, the governing body of
the municipality or county; and
(B) For a cooperative area, the group of persons
designated for the cooperative area in the written agreement establishing the
cooperative area;
(9) “Formation charter” means the foundational governing
document of the economic development district that establishes the formation
of the economic development district under § 14-177-204;
(10) “Property charge” means a monetary charge equal to what the
applicable ad valorem property tax and special assessments would be if the
economic development district did not exist, including any additional ad
valorem-based charge equal to an additional millage rate assessed by the
board of an economic development district;
(11) “Property charge baseline” means an amount equal to a
property’s ad valorem property tax and special assessments due the year
before the property became part of an economic development district;
(12) “Property charge increment” means the amount by which the
property charge exceeds the property charge baseline;
(13)(A) “Public infrastructure” means a facility, service, or
installation that is useful for the operation and growth of an economic
development district.
(B) “Public infrastructure” includes without limitation:
(i) A transportation system, including without
limitation a road, a trail, lighting, a traffic signal, a sidewalk, and
parking;
(ii) Demolition;
(iii) A public safety measure;
(iv) Stormwater drainage;
(v) A utility, including without limitation a water
utility, a sewer utility, an electric power utility, and a gas utility;
(vi) Digital infrastructure, including without
limitation broadband and telecommunications infrastructure;
(vii) Energy production; and
(viii) Green infrastructure, including without
limitation parks, green spaces, and renewable energy systems;
(14) "Reserved property charge” means the portion of a property
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
charge, if any, in excess of the property charge baseline reserved by an
establishing authority in the formation charter;
(15) “Reserved sales charge” means the portion of a sales
charge, if any, in excess of the sales charge baseline reserved by an
establishing authority in the formation charter;
(16)(A) “Sales charge” means a monetary charge equal to what the
following taxes would be if the economic development district did not exist:
(i) Sales and use tax, including without limitation
the taxes levied under Title 26, Chapters 52, 53, 74, and 75; and
(ii) Alcoholic beverage sales tax.
(B) “Sales charge” includes:
(i) The sales and use tax on a transaction in which
the end-user or purchaser takes possession of tangible personal property,
specified digital products, or a digital code or makes the first use of a
taxable service; and
(ii) Any additional percentage-based charge equal to
an additional rate assessed by the board of an economic development district.
(C) “Sales charge” does not include any tax applicable to
the possession of tangible personal property by a shipping company on behalf
of a purchaser;
(17) “Sales charge baseline” means the amount of sales and use
tax and alcoholic beverage sales tax generated from transactions occurring
within a property the year before the property became part of an economic
development district; and
(18) “Sales charge increment” means the amount by which the
sales charge exceeds the sales charge baseline.

14-177-103. Assistance from Department of Commerce.
(a) The Department of Commerce shall:
(1) Provide ongoing support and assistance to municipalities,
counties, cooperative areas, and economic development districts in the
establishment, management, and strategic development of economic development
districts;
(2) Allocate resources, including without limitation expert
advice, administrative guidance, and access to state-level economic
development tools, to assist municipalities, counties, cooperative areas, and
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
economic development districts;
(3) Offer technical assistance to assist municipalities,
counties, and cooperative areas in drafting an initial proposal to form an
economic development district, defining the boundaries of a proposed economic
development district, and conducting the economic and impact assessments
necessary for the establishment of an economic development district;
(4) Provide training programs for municipality and county
officials and members of a board of an economic development district on
topics that include economic development strategies, financial management,
and grant administration;
(5)(A) Assist in setting up systems for monitoring and
evaluating the performance of an economic development district to ensure that
each economic development district meets the economic development objectives
for the economic development district.
(B) To facilitate meeting the requirements of subdivision
(a)(5)(A) of this section, the department shall maintain an online repository
of projects that includes publicly available information about each project;
(6) Assist economic development districts in establishing clear
and effective grant application processes to ensure transparency and fairness
in the distribution of funds under this chapter; and
(7)(A) Provide guidance to economic development districts on
financial oversight practices to ensure that all grant funds are used
appropriately and effectively.
(B) To facilitate meeting the requirements of subdivision
(a)(7)(A) of this section, the department may:
(i) Review and conduct audits of any economic
development district; and
(ii) Adopt appropriate rules to promote the orderly
administration of economic development districts and prevent malfeasance,
mismanagement, or fraud in the operation of an economic development district.
(b) To compensate the department for its obligations under this
section, each board of an economic development district shall remit to the
department the following:
(1) Two percent (2%) of the property charge increment, minus the
reserved property charge, received by the economic development district
annually; and
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(2) Two percent (2%) of the sales charge increment, minus the
reserved sales charge, received by the economic development district
annually.

Subchapter 2 — Economic Development Districts — Creation and Termination

14-177-201. Authorization to establish economic development district.
(a) A municipality, county, or cooperative area may establish one (1)
or more economic development districts within the boundaries of the
municipality, county, or cooperative area.
(b) A county may establish an economic development district within the
boundaries of a municipality only with consent of the mayor of the
municipality.
(c) A municipality may use county tax revenues for an economic
development district only with the consent of the county judge of the county
that levied the tax.
(d) An economic development district is not required to have
contiguous boundaries.

14-177-202. Proposal to create economic development district.
(a) The creation of an economic development district may be proposed
by the:
(1) Delivery of a proposal signed by the owners of at least
twenty-five percent (25%) of the assessed value of the property within the
boundaries of the proposed economic development district to the proposed
establishing authority;
(2) Delivery of a proposal by a mayor or county judge to the
proposed establishing authority; or
(3) Creation of a proposal by the proposed establishing
authority.
(b) A proposal for the creation of an economic development district
under this section shall include:
(1) A map of the boundaries of the proposed economic development
district;
(2) A preliminary economic development plan; and
(3) An assessment of the current economic conditions within the
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
boundaries of the proposed economic development district and the expected
impact of the proposed economic development district.

14-177-203. Approval process for establishment of economic development
district.
(a) An establishing authority considering the creation of a proposed
economic development district under this subchapter shall:
(1) Conduct a public hearing on the creation of the proposed
economic development district within ninety (90) days after receiving a
proposal under this subchapter; and
(2)(A) Provide notice of the public hearing required under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section at least thirty (30) days before the
public hearing.
(B) Notice provided under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this
section shall be:
(i) Published in a newspaper of general circulation
in the proposed economic development district; or
(ii) Provided by means of public notification other
than a newspaper of general circulation that is authorized by the
establishing authority and reasonably calculated to provide notice to
property owners within the boundaries of the proposed economic development
district.
(b) After holding the public hearing required under subsection (a) of
this section, an establishing authority may create an economic development
district by approving a formation charter that meets the requirements of §
14-177-204 by the adoption of an ordinance by a majority vote of the present
and participating members of the establishing authority.

14-177-204. Formation charter — Amendment.
(a) A formation charter shall include:
(1) The boundaries of the economic development district;
(2) The term of the economic development district, which shall
not exceed thirty (30) years;
(3) The economic development plan for the economic development
district;
(4) The number of members of the board of the economic
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
development district;
(5) Any reserved property charge;
(6) Any reserved sales charge; and
(7) Any restrictions on the powers of the board of the economic
development district.
(b)(1) The establishing authority for an economic development district
may amend the formation charter upon the petition of the:
(A) Mayor of the municipality governed by the establishing
authority;
(B) County judge of a county governed by the establishing
authority;
(C) Mayor of any municipality or the county judge of any
county participating in a cooperative area governed by the establishing
authority;
(D) Board of the economic development district; or
(E) Establishing authority.
(2) An amendment to a formation charter under this subsection
may expand or contract the:
(A) Boundaries of the economic development district; or
(B) Authority granted to the board of the economic
development district.
(3) If an economic development district is party to an executory
contract or has outstanding bonds secured by revenue of the economic
development district, the establishing authority for the economic development
district shall not amend the formation charter to do any of the following in
a manner that would reasonably impair the performance of the executory
contract or the repayment of the outstanding bonds, unless the establishing
authority agrees to assume the economic development district’s obligations
under the executory contract or the repayment of the outstanding bonds:
(A) Reduce the boundaries of the economic development
district;
(B) Increase the reserved property charge;
(C) Increase the reserved sales charge;
(D) Decrease the term of the economic development
district; or
(E) Modify the powers of the board of the economic
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
development district.
(4) A petition to amend a formation charter under this
subsection is subject to the same approval process and requirements provided
for the establishment of an economic development district under § 14-177-203.

14-177-205. Renewal of term of economic development district.
(a) The establishing authority for an economic development district
may renew the economic development district for successive terms of up to
thirty (30) years each upon the petition of the:
(1) Mayor of the municipality governed by the establishing
authority;
(2) County judge of a county governed by the establishing
authority;
(3) Mayor of any municipality or the county judge of any county
participating in a cooperative area governed by the establishing authority;
(4) Board of the economic development district; or
(5) Establishing authority.
(b) A petition to renew the term of an economic development district
under this subsection is subject to the same approval process and
requirements provided for the establishment of an economic development
district under § 14-177-203.

14-177-206. Termination of economic development district.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
establishing authority of an economic development district may terminate the
economic development district upon the petition of the board of the economic
development district or by revoking the formation charter.
(2) If an economic development district is party to an executory
contract or has outstanding bonds secured by revenue of the economic
development district, the establishing authority for the economic development
district shall not terminate the economic development district to do any of
the following in a manner that would reasonably impair the performance of the
executory contract or the repayment of the outstanding bonds, unless the
establishing authority agrees to assume the economic development district’s
obligations under the executory contract or the repayment of the outstanding
bonds:
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(A) Reduce the boundaries of the economic development
district;
(B) Increase the reserved property charge;
(C) Increase the reserved sales charge;
(D) Decrease the term of the economic development
district; or
(E) Modify the powers of the board of the economic
development district.
(b) Upon termination of an economic development district, all assets
remaining with the economic development district shall be turned over to the
establishing authority to be used for the purposes stated in the economic
development plan for the economic development district.
(c) A petition to terminate an economic development district and the
revocation of a formation charter under this section are subject to the same
approval process and requirements provided for the establishment of an
economic development district under § 14-177-203.

14-177-207. Cooperative areas.
(a) An agreement creating a cooperative area may allocate the:
(1) Property charge baseline, reserved property charge, sales
charge baseline, and reserved sales charge among the municipalities and
counties participating in the economic development district based on an
agreed-upon percentage allocation of the entire economic development district
instead of basing the revenue on the physical nexus from where the revenue is
generated; and
(2) Provision of governmental services within the economic
development district among the taxing authorities participating in the
economic development district.
(b) The ad valorem property tax rate used to establish the property
charge, property charge baseline, and property charge increment for a
cooperative area shall be:
(1) Uniform throughout the economic development district; and
(2) Equal to the highest ad valorem tax of the municipalities
and counties participating in the economic development district.
(c) The percentage-based sales and use tax rate and the alcoholic
beverage sales tax rate used to establish the sales charge, sales charge
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
baseline, and sales charge increment for a cooperative area shall be:
(1) Uniform throughout the economic development district; and
(2) Equal to the highest sales and use tax rate and the
alcoholic beverage sales tax rate of the municipalities and counties
participating in the economic development district.

14-177-208. Annexation prohibited.
Property within the boundaries of an economic development district
shall not be involuntarily annexed into a municipality.

Subchapter 3 — Boards of Economic Development Districts

14-177-301. Board of economic development district generally.
(a) An economic development district shall be governed by a board
consisting of at least five (5) but not more than nine (9) members.
(b) Except as provided in subsection (d) of this section, the
formation charter shall provide that:
(1) At least one (1) member of the board of the economic
development district shall be a property owner or business owner within the
economic development district; and
(2) At least one (1) member of the board of the economic
development district shall be an individual who holds no ownership interest
in any property or business within the economic development district.
(c) All members of the board of an economic development district shall
be qualified electors of the establishing authority.
(d) The establishing authority may serve as the board of the economic
development district.
(e) For a board of an economic development district established in a
cooperative area, the agreement establishing the cooperative area shall
provide for the allocation of members of the board of the economic
development district among the participants of the cooperative area.

14-177-302. Appointment — Terms.
(a)(1) The members of the board of an economic development district
shall be appointed:
(A) By the mayor if the establishing authority is a
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
municipality;
(B) By the county judge if the establishing authority is a
county; and
(C) As designated in the agreement establishing the
cooperative area if the economic development district was established in a
cooperative area.
(2)(A) An appointee to a board of an economic development
district is subject to confirmation by the establishing authority of the
person making the appointment.
(B) If an appointee is not ratified or rejected by a
majority of the establishing authority present and participating within sixty
(60) days of the appointment, the appointment is deemed to be rejected.
(b)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the
formation charter shall reserve a seat on the board of the economic
development district for a person appointed by the:
(A) Mayor of each municipality having corporate limits
within the economic development district at the time of formation; and
(B) County judge of each county in which the economic
development district is located.
(2) The establishing authority of an economic development
district may elect not to provide a seat on the board of the economic
development district to a municipality or county in which the economic
development district is located if the formation charter designates a
reserved property charge and a reserved sales charge in favor of the excluded
municipality or county equal to the ad valorem property tax, sales and use
tax, and alcoholic beverage sales tax that would have been received by the
municipality or county but for the existence of the economic development
district.
(c)(1) A member of a board of an economic development district:
(A) Shall serve a term of four (4) years; and
(B) Is eligible for reappointment for additional terms.
(2) Initial appointments to a board of an economic development
district shall be staggered so that:
(A) One (1) member serves an initial term of one (1) year;
(B) One (1) member serves an initial term of two (2)
years; and
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(C) One (1) member serves an initial term of three (3)
years.
(d) A vacancy on a board of an economic development district shall be
filled in the same manner as provided for appointments under this section.

14-177-303. Conflicts of interest — Removal.
(a) A member of a board of an economic development district shall:
(1) Disclose any potential conflicts of interest arising from
his or her duties on the board of the economic development district; and
(2) Recuse from any decisions in which a conflict of interest is
present unless the conflict of interest is disclosed and waived by a majority
vote of the other members of the board of the economic development district.
(b) A member of a board of an economic development district may be
removed by the establishing authority for the economic development district
for cause, including without limitation nonperformance, malfeasance, or
conflict of interest.

14-177-304. Powers and duties.
(a) The board of an economic development district shall:
(1) Develop and approve a strategic plan outlining the vision,
goals, and strategies for economic development within the economic
development district;
(2) Annually review and update the strategic plan approved under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section;
(3) Approve an annual budget and oversee the financial
management of the economic development district, ensuring that funds are used
efficiently and aligned with the strategic plan of the economic development
district;
(4) Oversee the distribution of grant funds, ensuring that all
grants align with the economic development district's objectives and comply
with established criteria for the grants;
(5) Establish and monitor performance metrics for the economic
development district’s initiatives and use the data obtained to guide the
strategic decisions of the board of the economic development district; and
(6)(A) Prepare an annual report detailing the economic
development district’s financial status, progress toward the goals of the
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
economic development district, and ongoing and planned activities of the
economic development district.
(B) The annual report prepared under subdivision (a)(6)(A)
of this section shall be:
(i) Made publicly available; and
(ii) Presented to the establishing authority of the
economic development district.
(b) The board of an economic development district may:
(1) Exercise zoning and land use planning authority within the
economic development district in accordance with rules established by the
board of the economic development district;
(2) Reduce or waive franchise fees as an incentive for utilities
to provide or enhance services within the economic development district;
(3) Determine that a venture or facility is beneficial to the
economic development district if the venture or facility promotes economic
development;
(4) Enter into and enforce contracts in accordance with the
procurement requirements of the establishing authority of the economic
development district;
(5) Acquire, hold, and possess real and personal property; and
(6)(A) Except as provided in subdivision (b)(6)(B) of this
section, exercise any lawful powers not denied the economic development
district by the formation charter.
(B) The board of an economic development district shall
not exercise the powers granted under this section in a manner that adversely
impairs any outstanding debt obligations that are specifically secured by
fees and charges or that would reasonably impair the repayment of an
outstanding bond.
(c) A board of an economic development district has the powers stated
in this section unless specifically restricted under the formation charter.

14-177-305. Meetings of board of economic development district.
(a) A board of an economic development district shall meet at least
quarterly but may meet more frequently as needed.
(b)(1) A meeting of a board of an economic development district shall
be open to the public, except when the board of the economic development
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
district calls an executive session under subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(2) A board of an economic development district may call an
executive session to discuss matters that:
(A) Require confidentiality under state or federal law;
(B) Require confidentiality under a contract to which the
economic development district is a party; or
(C) Constitute records that are exempt from the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.
(c) Minutes of all meetings of a board of an economic development
district shall be recorded and made available to the public.

14-177-306. Records exempt from disclosure.
(a) Records of a board of an economic development district and records
of employees of the economic development district that, if disclosed, would
give an advantage to competitors or bidders are exempt from the Freedom of
Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq., unless approval for release of
the records is granted by the business entity that is the subject of the
records.
(b) The exemption allowed under subsection (a) of this section does
not apply to records of expenditures or grants that are made or administered
by the board of the economic development district and are otherwise
disclosable under this chapter.

14-177-307. Financial oversight and transparency.
(a)(1) The financial operations of an economic development district
shall be audited annually by an independent auditor to ensure proper use of
funds and adherence to all legal requirements.
(2) The audit report obtained under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section shall be submitted to the establishing authority of the economic
development district within ninety (90) days after receipt of the audit
report by the board of the economic development district.
(b) Financial records related to the economic development district’s
operations, including the sources and uses of funds received by the economic
development district, shall be accessible to the public to ensure
transparency and accountability.

04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
14-177-308. Authority to place economic development district in
receivership — Appointment of receiver — Bankruptcy prohibited.
(a) The establishing authority or the board of an economic development
district may place the economic development district into receivership if:
(1) The board of the economic development district fails to
fulfill its duties or obligations under this chapter;
(2) The economic development district becomes insolvent or lacks
sufficient financial resources to meet the obligation of the economic
development district; or
(3) There is evidence of malfeasance, mismanagement, or fraud by
the board of the economic development district that threatens the effective
operation of the economic development district or the proper administration
of the financial resources of the economic development district.
(b)(1) The board of an economic development district or the
establishing authority of the economic development district may petition the
circuit court in the county where the economic development district is
located for an order placing the economic development district into
receivership.
(2) A petition under subdivision (b)(1) of this section shall
demonstrate the specific grounds for the receivership, including without
limitation documentation of the failures of the board of the economic
development district or the insolvency of the economic development district.
(3) The circuit court receiving a petition filed under this
subsection shall hear the petition on an expedited basis.
(c) Upon the determination by a circuit court that grounds for
receivership of an economic development district exist, the circuit court
shall:
(1) Appoint the establishing authority of the economic
development district or its designee as the receiver of the economic
development district; and
(2) Grant the receiver full authority to suspend the board of
the economic development district and administer the economic development
district with all rights, privileges, and obligations conferred on the board
of the economic development district under this chapter.
(d) The establishing authority of the economic development district
may replace any members of the board of the economic development district
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
during the receivership.
(e) A receivership authorized under this section shall:
(1) Continue until the economic development district is able to
fulfill its statutory and financial obligations, as determined by the
establishing authority of the economic development district; and
(2) End upon petition by the establishing authority of the
economic development district to the circuit court certifying that the need
for the receivership has ended.
(f) An economic development district shall not file for bankruptcy.

Subchapter 4 — Economic Development District Funding

14-177-401. Funds and use of funds.
(a) Funding for grants, credits, or abatements under this chapter
within an economic development district may be derived from any combination
of the following sources:
(1) The payment of a property charge under § 14-177-402;
(2) The payment of a sales charge under § 14-177-403;
(3) The payment of an additional property charge under § 14-177-
406;
(4) The payment of an additional sales charge under § 14-177-
407; and
(5) Public and private grants.
(b) An economic development district may:
(1) Solicit and accept grants and other funds from public
sources; and
(2) Accept contributions and donations from private sources.
(c) An economic development district may pledge any available funds in
whole or in part to the repayment of bond financing.
(d) All available funds of an economic development district shall be
used exclusively within the boundaries of the economic development district:
(1) For economic development construction and public
infrastructure in accordance with the economic development plan for the
economic development district; or
(2) To pay expenses necessary to accomplish the economic
development goals of the economic development district as stated in the
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
formation charter.

14-177-402. Property charge — Exemption from ad valorem taxation.
(a) All property within an economic development district is exempt
from the payment of ad valorem property taxes.
(b)(1) Property located within the boundaries of an economic
development district is subject to a property charge.
(2) A property charge shall be collected at the same time and in
the same manner as ad valorem property taxes.
(3) Property that would be exempt from ad valorem property taxes
outside of an economic development district is exempt from a property charge
imposed by an economic development district.
(c)(1) As long as property is within an economic development district,
the county collector of the county in which the economic development district
is located shall remit:
(A) A pro rata portion of the property charge equal to the
property charge baseline:
(i) To the taxing authorities and improvement
districts that would have received ad valorem property taxes if the property
were not in an economic development district; or
(ii) For a cooperative area, in accordance with the
allocation agreed to by municipalities and counties participating in the
cooperative area; and
(B) Any remaining amount to the economic development
district.
(2) If the property charge is less than the property charge
baseline in any year, the property charge baseline shall be reduced to the
amount of the property charge actually received by the county collector.
(d) A board of an economic development district may receive, spend,
pledge, save, grant, allocate, or abate the property charge increment for
property located within the boundaries of the economic development district
unless specifically prohibited in the formation charter.
(e) The failure to pay a property charge under this section is subject
to the same remedies and enforcement as would otherwise apply to the failure
to pay ad valorem property taxes if the property were not within an economic
development district.
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647

14-177-403. Sales charge — Exemption from sales and use tax and
alcoholic beverage sales tax.
(a) A sales transaction sourced within an economic development
district is exempt from sales and use tax and the alcoholic beverage sales
tax.
(b)(1) A sales transaction sourced to property within an economic
development district is subject to a sales charge.
(2) A business operating within an economic development district
shall collect and remit a sales charge to the economic development district
that imposed the sales charge.
(3) A sales charge shall be collected and administered at the
same time and in the same manner as sales and use taxes.
(4) A sales transaction that would be exempt from sales and use
tax or the alcoholic beverage sales tax outside of an economic development
district is exempt from a sales charge imposed by an economic development
district.
(c)(1) As long as property is within an economic development district,
the Department of Finance and Administration shall remit:
(A) A pro rata portion of the sales charge imposed on
sales transactions sourced to property within the economic development
district equal to the sales charge baseline:
(i) To the taxing authorities that would have
received sales and use taxes and alcoholic beverage sales taxes if the sales
transaction had not occurred in an economic development district; or
(ii) For a cooperative area, in accordance with the
allocation agreed to by the municipalities and counties participating in the
cooperative area; and
(B) Any remaining amount to the economic development
district.
(2) If the sales charge is less than the sales charge baseline
in any year, the sales charge baseline shall be reduced to the amount of the
sales charge actually received by the department.
(d)(1) The state is entitled to the portion of the sales charge that
would have been received by the state if the sales transaction were not
sourced to property within an economic development district.
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(2) The board of an economic development district may receive,
spend, pledge, save, grant, allocate, or abate the sales charge increment
unless specifically prohibited in the formation charter.
(e) The failure to collect and remit a sales charge under this section
is subject to the same remedies and enforcement as would otherwise apply to
the failure to pay sales or use tax or the alcoholic beverage sales tax if
the sales transaction were not sourced to property within an economic
development district.

14-177-404. Reserved property charge — Allocation.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
establishing authority for an economic development district may designate a
reserved property charge in the formation charter as a percentage of the
total property charge in excess of the property charge baseline.
(2) A reserved property charge shall not include any additional
property charge authorized by the board of an economic development district
under § 14-177-406.
(b) The formation charter may designate a reserved property charge
that applies for only a specified time period.
(c) A reserved property charge is invalid unless the reserved property
charge is expressly provided for in the formation charter.
(d)(1) If there is a reserved property charge, the reserved property
charge shall be remitted in accordance with:
(A) The allocation provided by the formation charter; or
(B) For a cooperative area, the agreement of the
municipalities and counties participating in the cooperative area.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by agreement among the taxing
authorities that would otherwise have received ad valorem property taxes if
the economic development district did not exist, the formation charter shall
provide that any reserved property charge be allocated among the taxing
authorities in the same percentage as the ad valorem property taxes would
otherwise have been allocated if the economic development district did not
exist.

14-177-405. Reserved sales charge — Allocation.
(a)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (a)(2) of this section, the
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
establishing authority for an economic development district may designate a
reserved sales charge in the formation charter as a percentage of the total
sales charge in excess of the sales charge baseline.
(2) A reserved sales charge shall not include any additional
sales charge authorized by the board of an economic development district
under § 14-177-407.
(b) The formation charter may designate a reserved sales charge that
applies for only a specified time period.
(c) A reserved sales charge is invalid unless the reserved sales
charge is expressly provided for in the formation charter.
(d)(1) If there is a reserved sales charge, the reserved sales charge
shall be remitted in accordance with:
(A) The allocation provided by the formation charter; or
(B) For a cooperative area, the agreement of the
municipalities and counties participating in the cooperative area.
(2) Unless otherwise provided by agreement among the taxing
authorities that would otherwise have received sales and use taxes and
alcoholic beverage sales tax if the economic development district did not
exist, the formation charter shall provide that any reserved sales charge be
allocated among the taxing authorities in the same percentage as the sales
and use taxes and alcoholic beverage sales tax would otherwise have been
allocated if the economic development district did not exist.

14-177-406. Additional property charge.
(a)(1) The board of an economic development district may impose an
additional millage rate-based charge on the value of property within the
economic development district.
(2) An additional property charge imposed under subdivision
(a)(1) of this section shall be collected and allocated in the same manner as
the property charge that applies to property within the economic development
district.
(b) The additional property charge allowed under this section shall
not apply to property that would be exempt from ad valorem tax if the
property were not located within an economic development district.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a
board of an economic development district shall not increase an additional
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
property charge imposed under this section by more than ten percent (10%) of
the millage rate that would have applied to the property if the property were
not located in an economic development district.
(2) A board of an economic development district may increase an
additional property charge imposed under this section by more than ten
percent (10%) of the millage rate that would have applied to the property if
the property were not located in an economic development district if, at the
time of the proposed increase, all property owners within the economic
development district to which the additional property charge would apply
provide written consent to the increase.

14-177-407. Additional sales charge.
(a)(1) The board of an economic development district may impose an
additional percentage-based charge on sales transactions occurring within the
economic development district.
(2) An additional sales charge imposed under subdivision (a)(1)
of this section shall be collected and allocated in the same manner as the
sales charge that applies to sales transactions sourced to property within
the economic development district.
(b) The additional sales charge allowed under this section shall not
apply to sales transactions that would be exempt from sales and use taxes if
the sales transaction did not occur within an economic development district.
(c)(1) Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a
board of an economic development district shall not increase an additional
sales charge imposed under this section by more than ten percent (10%) of the
sales and use tax rate that would have applied to the sales transaction if
the sales transaction had not been sourced to property within an economic
development district.
(2) A board of an economic development district may increase an
additional sales charge imposed under this section by more than ten percent
(10%) of the sales and use tax rate that would have applied to the sales
transaction if the sales transaction had not been sourced to property within
an economic development district if, at the time of the proposed increase,
all property owners within the economic development district to which the
additional sales charge would apply provide written consent to the increase.

04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
14-177-408. Cooperation of county officials and Department of Finance
and Administration.
(a)(1) A county assessor serving an area within the boundaries of an
economic development district shall cooperate with the board of the economic
development district to assess property within the economic development
district for the amount of the property charge for the economic development
district.
(2) A county assessor shall calculate the property charge for an
economic development district applying the same timing, methods, and
penalties used to appraise and assess the property located in the economic
development district that would apply if the property were not in an economic
development district.
(3)(A) A county assessor is entitled to any commission to which
the county assessor would be entitled if the economic development district
did not exist, based on the amount of the property charge baseline and the
reserved property charge.
(B) Any commission to which a county assessor is entitled
shall be paid out of the property charge baseline and any reserved property
charge.
(b)(1) A county collector serving an area within the boundaries of an
economic development district shall cooperate with the board of the economic
development district to collect the property charge for the economic
development district.
(2) A county collector shall apply the same timing, methods, and
penalties used for the collection of the property charge that would be
applicable if the property were not in an economic development district.
(3)(A) A county collector is entitled to any commission to which
the county collector would be entitled if the economic development district
did not exist, based on the amount of the property charge baseline and any
reserved property charge.
(B) Any commission to which a county assessor is entitled
shall be paid out of the property charge baseline and any reserved property
charge.
(c) The Department of Finance and Administration shall:
(1) Receive and collect the sales charge for an economic
development district from all retailers and persons responsible for paying
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
the sales charge within the economic development district; and
(2) Apply the same timing, methods, and penalties for the
collection of the sales charge that would be applicable if the sales
transaction were not sourced to property within an economic development
district.

Subchapter 5 — Economic Development District Grants

14-177-501. Authorization for grants.
(a) The formation charter may authorize the board of an economic
development district to provide assistance in the form of grants of
forgivable loans or transferable credits against future payments of the
property charge for the economic development district above the property
charge baseline or the sales charge for the economic development district
above the sales charge baseline, or both.
(b) The board of an economic development district may waive or reduce
utility franchise fees that would have otherwise been due within the economic
development district.
(c) The board of an economic development district may make payments of
cash for economic development construction and public infrastructure within
the economic development district.

14-177-502. Grant eligibility and terms.
(a) A grant under this subchapter may be made available only to:
(1) An owner of property within the boundaries of an economic
development district;
(2) A tenant of property within the boundaries of an economic
development district if the tenant has a lease term that extends beyond the
loan forgiveness period under the grant; or
(3) A public or franchised utility service provider.
(b)(1) A grant may be awarded under this subchapter in the form of a
forgivable loan in an amount based on the scope and expected impact of the
proposed project, as evaluated and determined by the board of the economic
development district.
(2) A grant awarded under this subchapter as a forgivable loan
may be structured so that some or all of the amount due may be forgiven if
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
the conditions of the grant are met.
(3) The interest rate for a forgivable loan granted under this
subchapter may be below market or zero percent (0%) to encourage uptake and
project initiation.
(4) The board of an economic development district may require
security for the repayment of a forgivable loan granted under this
subchapter.
(c) A grant may be awarded under this subchapter in the form of
transferable credits useable against future payments of the property charge
above the property charge increment or the sales charge above the sales
charge increment, or both.
(d) The recipient of a grant under this subchapter shall submit an
annual report to the board of the economic development district detailing the
recipient's progress toward meeting the criteria for the forgivable loan or
transferable credits awarded under the grant.
(e) The board of an economic development district may employ an
independent review committee or third-party auditor to verify that a
recipient of a grant awarded under this subchapter has met the criteria for
the grant before approving forgiveness of the loan or additional allocation
of transferable credits.

14-177-503. Grant application process.
(a) An applicant for a grant under this subchapter shall submit to the
board of the economic development district a detailed proposal outlining the
proposed project, the expected outcomes of the proposed project, the budget
for the proposed project, and the alignment of the proposed project with the
objectives of the economic development district.
(b)(1) A grant awarded under this subchapter is contingent on the
recipient's meeting predefined performance targets established by the board
of the economic development district.
(2) The predefined performance targets for a grant awarded in
the form of transferable credits shall be based on any combination of job
creation, job retention, average salary increases, investment of funds other
than grant funds received from the economic development district and spent
within the economic development district, and the provision of specific
services or amenities within the economic development district.
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(c) The board of an economic development district shall review an
application submitted under this section and evaluate the application based
on the strategic fit, potential impact, and feasibility of the proposed
project.

14-177-504. Reporting requirement.
(a) A recipient of a grant under this subchapter shall submit to the
board of the economic development district that awarded the grant an annual
accounting of the use of the grant funds and an annual report detailing the
recipient's compliance with the terms of the grant, including without
limitation updates on investment levels, employment figures, and other
relevant performance-based criteria.
(b) The failure of a recipient of a grant awarded under this
subchapter to meet the agreed-upon terms of the grant may result in the
recapture of benefits received under the grant, repayment of any disbursed
loan funds, renegotiation of any loan terms, or other remedies deemed
appropriate by the board of the economic development district, including
without limitation foreclosure of the security for a forgivable loan awarded
under this subchapter.

Subchapter 6 — Abatement of Property Charge Increment or Sales Charge
Increment

14-177-601. Abatement authorized.
(a) The formation charter may authorize the board of the economic
development district to grant temporary abatement of the property charge
increment or the sales charge increment, or both, to eligible businesses and
developers within the economic development district to promote economic
development, attract investments, mitigate blight, and increase or retain
employment opportunities.
(b) Abatement of the property charge increment or the sales charge
increment, or both, under this subchapter may take the form of a freeze or
reduction in the future assessment of the property charge increment or the
sales charge increment, or both.

14-177-602. Eligibility and terms for abatement.
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(a) To qualify for abatement of the property charge increment or the
sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter, an applicant shall
demonstrate to the board of the economic development district that the
applicant's business or project will contribute to or facilitate job
creation, job retention, job attraction, economic growth, or economic
diversification within the economic development district.
(b)(1) Criteria for abatement of the property charge increment or the
sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter may include without
limitation the scale of the investment by the applicant, the number of jobs
created or retained by the applicant, the longevity and sustainability of the
applicant's business, and the strategic importance of the applicant's
business to the economic objectives of the economic development district.
(2) Abatement of the property charge increment or the sales
charge increment, or both, under this subchapter may also be granted to
applicants whose business or project is complimentary to the goals of the
economic development district.
(c) An applicant for abatement of the property charge increment or the
sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter shall not be granted
an abatement under this subchapter unless the applicant is in good standing
with the State of Arkansas.
(d)(1) The terms of an abatement of the property charge increment or
the sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter, including the
duration and percentage of the abatement, shall be determined by the board of
the economic development district based on the expected economic impact of
the applicant's proposed business or project.
(2) The duration of any abatement of the property charge
increment or the sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter shall
not exceed thirty (30) years.
(e) The board of an economic development district may require periodic
reviews of a business or project for which an applicant has been granted an
abatement of the property charge increment or the sales charge increment, or
both, under this subchapter to ensure that the business or project continues
to meet the eligibility criteria established at the time the abatement was
granted.

14-177-603. Application process for abatement — Agreement.
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(a) An applicant seeking abatement of the property charge increment or
the sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter shall submit a
detailed proposal to the board of the economic development district
outlining:
(1) The nature of the proposed business or project;
(2) The expected economic benefits of the proposed business or
project; and
(3) A justification for the request for abatement of the
property charge increment or the sales charge increment, or both.
(b) The board of an economic development district shall:
(1) Review all applications submitted under this section; and
(2) Determine whether to approve each application based on the:
(A) Strategic fit of the proposed business or project with
the goals of the board of the economic development district;
(B) Potential economic benefit of the proposed business or
project to the economic development district; and
(C) Any other criteria as provided in § 14-177-602.
(c) If a board of an economic development district approves an
application submitted under this section, the board of the economic
development district and the applicant shall execute an agreement concerning
the terms of the abatement of the property charge increment or the sales
charge increment, or both, under this subchapter.

14-177-604. Reporting requirement.
(a) A recipient of an abatement of the property charge increment or
the sales charge increment, or both, under this subchapter shall submit an
annual report to the board of the economic development district that awarded
the abatement detailing the recipient's compliance with the terms of the
abatement agreement, including without limitation updates on investment
levels, employment figures, and other relevant performance-based criteria.
(b) The failure of a recipient of an abatement under this subchapter
to meet the agreed-upon terms of the abatement may result in the:
(1) Revocation of the abatement of the property charge increment
or the sales charge increment, or both; and
(2) Board of the economic development district's requiring:
(A) Repayment of the abated property charge increment and
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
the sales charge increment; or
(B) Payment of any performance security.

Subchapter 7 — Economic Development District Bonds

14-177-701. Issuance of bonds — Terms and conditions.
(a) The formation charter may authorize the board of the economic
development district being formed to issue bonds to finance economic
development construction within the economic development district in
accordance with the economic development plan.
(b) The board of an economic development district shall determine the
terms of bonds issued under this subchapter, including the maturity, interest
rate, and repayment schedule for the bonds, based on the projected cash flow
from available funds and the financial needs of the projects proposed to be
funded by the bonds.
(c) A two-thirds majority vote of the board of an economic development
district is required to approve bonds issued under this subchapter.
(d) Approval for the issuance of bonds from the establishing authority
of the economic development district may be included in the formation
charter.

14-177-702. Repayment of bonds — Oversight.
(a) The repayment of bonds issued under this subchapter may be funded
through, paid for, and secured by available funds as determined by the board
of the economic development district.
(b)(1) Available funds may be pledged as security for bonds issued
under this subchapter to allow the economic development district to use the
available funds to service debt obligations related to the bonds.
(2) If available funds are pledged for the repayment of bonds
under this subsection, the board of an economic development district shall
establish a detailed plan demonstrating the sufficiency of the available
funds to cover debt service requirements while maintaining the operational
and developmental objectives and obligations of the economic development
district.
(c) The board of an economic development district shall:
(1) Establish a bond oversight committee to:
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(A) Monitor the use of bond proceeds under this
subchapter; and
(B) Ensure that the bond proceeds are used for the
purposes specified in the bond issuance documents; and
(2) Conduct regular audits to assess the:
(A) Management and utilization of bond proceeds under this
subchapter; and
(B) Adequacy of the available funds to service debt
obligations related to the bonds issued under this subchapter.

14-177-703. Guarantee of bond repayment.
(a) To enhance the creditworthiness of bonds issued under this
subchapter and to support substantial economic development initiatives, an
establishing authority may guarantee the repayment of bonds issued by an
economic development district using any portion or combination of the
property charge baseline, sales charge baseline, reserved property charge,
and reserved sales charge received by the establishing authority.
(b) An establishing authority’s guarantee of bonds under this section
shall be structured as follows:
(1) For the first three (3) years after the issuance of the
bonds, the establishing authority may guarantee up to one hundred percent
(100%) of the bond repayments;
(2) For the fourth and fifth year after the issuance of the
bonds, the establishing authority may guarantee up to fifty percent (50%) of
the bond repayments; and
(3) For the sixth and seventh years after the issuance of the
bonds, the establishing authority may guarantee up to thirty-three percent
(33%) of the bond repayments.
(c) The maturity date of bonds guaranteed under this section may
extend beyond the term of the guarantee provided by the establishing
authority.
(d) A decision to guarantee the repayment of bonds under this section
shall be approved by a majority vote of the members of the establishing
authority.
(e) An establishing authority that guarantees the repayment of bonds
under this section shall:
04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259

SB647
(1)(A) Establish a special guarantee fund from which guaranteed
amounts will be paid.
(B) The special guarantee fund established under
subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section shall be replenished annually with the
specified portion of the property charge baseline, reserved property charge,
sales charge baseline, and reserved sales charge received by the economic
development district.
(C) An establishing authority that establishes a special
guarantee fund under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section shall establish
protocols to manage the special guarantee fund to ensure that there are
sufficient funds available to meet the guarantee obligations of the
establishing authority under this section as they become due;
(2) Conduct an annual independent audit of the special guarantee
fund established under subdivision (e)(1)(A) of this section and the
management of the special guarantee fund to ensure transparency and proper
use of the establishing authority’s revenues; and
(3) Implement risk mitigation strategies, including without
limitation setting aside reserve funds or obtaining reinsurance, to manage
the potential fiscal impact of the guarantee provided under this section.
(f)(1) Before approving a guarantee under this section, an
establishing authority shall conduct a risk assessment to evaluate the
potential financial impact on the establishing authority’s finances.
(2) The risk assessment required under subdivision (f)(1) of
this section shall consider the:
(A) Viability of the projects funded by the bonds issued
under this chapter; and
(B) Expected revenues of the economic development
district.

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Contingent effective date.
This act is effective on and after January 1, 2027, contingent on
Senate Joint Resolution 15 of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly being
referred to the people and adopted at the 2026 general election.



04/16/2025 9:25:56 AM JLL259